Utah statutes.
41-1a-607.   Assignment by lienholder.

(1) (a)  Any person holding a lien or encumbrance upon a vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor, other than a lien dependent solely upon possession, may assign his title or interest in or to the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor to a person other than the owner without the consent of and without affecting the interest of the owner or the registration of the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor.

(b)  If assignment of the lien or encumbrance in any way modifies or affects the owner's repayment agreement, the lien or encumbrance holder shall give to the owner a written notice of the assignment.

(2)  Upon request to the division and upon receipt of a certificate of title assigned by the holder of a lien or encumbrance shown on it and giving the name and address of the assignee, accompanied by the fee provided by law, the division shall issue a new certificate of title.

